Maine, session 132, LD1734.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1760, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2011, c. 548, §15, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
5. Medicines. Sales of medicine for human beings:
A. Sold on a doctor's prescription; or
B. Sold as an over-the-counter medicine or drug for use in or on the human body that
is subject to the format and content requirements of the United States Food and Drug
Administration under 21 Code of Federal Regulations, Section 201.66. As used in this
paragraph, "over-the-counter medicine or drug" means anesthetics; antacids;
anthelmintics; antibacterial, antifungal and antiviral medicine; antiseptics; astringents;
contraceptive supplies, including all contraceptive drugs, devices and products
approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration to prevent pregnancy;
emetics and antiemetics; medication prepared for use in the eyes, ears or nose; opioid
antagonists; products intended to be taken for coughs, colds, asthma or allergies; and
steroidal medicines.
This subsection does not apply to the sale of cannabis pursuant to Title 22, chapter 558‑C.
Sec. 2. Effective date. This Act applies to sales occurring on or after January 1,
2026.